Colorado, session 2026A, HB1077.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-28.8-101, amend
(1.5); and add (4.5), (6.5) and (6.7) as follows:
39-28.8-101. Definitions.
Unless the context otherwise requires, any terms not defined in this
article 28.8 have the meanings set forth in article 26 of this title 39. As used
in this article 28.8, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1.5) "Average market rate" means the average price, as determined
by the department on a quarterly basis, of all unprocessed retail marijuana
that is sold or transferred from retail marijuana cultivation facilities in the
state to retail marijuana product manufacturing facilities or retail marijuana
stores, less taxes paid on the sales or transfers. An "average market rate"
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

may be based on the purchaser or transferee of unprocessed retail marijuana
or on the nature of the unprocessed retail marijuana that is sold or
transferred. The "average market rate" must include one or more rates that
cover unprocessed marijuana that is allocated to extractions, and the initial
rates for these product types must be lower than the rate for unprocessed
marijuana that is allocated for direct sale to consumers. INCLUDING FRESH
FROZEN INDOOR UNPROCESSED RETAIL MARIJUANA AND FRESH FROZEN
OUTDOOR UNPROCESSED RETAIL MARIJUANA. THE INITIAL RATES FOR
UNPROCESSED MARIJUANA THAT ARE ALLOCATED TO EXTRACTIONS MUST BE
LOWER THAN THE RATE FOR UNPROCESSED MARIJUANA THAT IS ALLOCATED
FOR DIRECT SALE TO CONSUMERS. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT RULES TO
ESTABLISH THE RATES FOR FRESH FROZEN INDOOR UNPROCESSED RETAIL
MARIJUANA AND FRESH FROZEN OUTDOOR UNPROCESSED RETAIL MARIJUANA
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027.
(4.5) "INDOOR UNPROCESSED RETAIL MARIJUANA" MEANS
UNPROCESSED RETAIL MARIJUANA CULTIVATED IN ANY MANNER OTHER
THAN OUTDOOR UNPROCESSED RETAIL MARIJUANA, AS DEFINED IN
SUBSECTION (6.7) OF THIS SECTION.
(6.5) "NATURAL WEATHER CONDITIONS" MEANS AMBIENT
TEMPERATURE, PRECIPITATION, AND HUMIDITY.
(6.7) (a) "OUTDOOR UNPROCESSED RETAIL MARIJUANA" MEANS
UNPROCESSED RETAIL MARIJUANA THAT, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN
SUBSECTION (6.7)(b) OF THIS SECTION, WAS CULTIVATED UNDER NATURAL
SUNLIGHT WITHOUT ARTIFICIAL LIGHT OR LIGHT DEPRIVATION, WITH DIRECT
EXPOSURE TO NATURAL WEATHER CONDITIONS, AND NOT WITHIN AN INDOOR
FACILITY, GREENHOUSE, OR OTHER STRUCTURE THAT PREVENTS EXPOSURE
TO NATURAL SUNLIGHT AND NATURAL WEATHER CONDITIONS.
(b) OUTDOOR UNPROCESSED MARIJUANA MAY BE:
(I) CULTIVATED USING ARTIFICIAL LIGHT TO MAINTAIN VEGETATIVE
PLANTS UNDER TWENTY-FOUR INCHES IN HEIGHT AND TO MAINTAIN MOTHER
PLANTS;
(II) CULTIVATED USING IRRIGATION, FERTIGATION, OR SIMILAR
AGRICULTURAL PRACTICES; AND
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1077

(III) PROTECTED FROM AN ADVERSE WEATHER EVENT PURSUANT TO
A CONTINGENCY PLAN APPROVED BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY
PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-10-602 (14).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 39-28.8-201.5 as
follows:
39-28.8-201.5. Average market rate - unprocessed retail
marijuana - description.
FOR EACH AVERAGE MARKET RATE CATEGORY OF UNPROCESSED
RETAIL MARIJUANA THAT THE DEPARTMENT ESTABLISHES PURSUANT TO
SECTION 39-28.8-101 (1.5), THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH A GENERAL
DESCRIPTION OF THE METHODOLOGY AND DATA SOURCES USED TO
CALCULATE THE RATE, WHILE PROTECTING CONFIDENTIAL, PROPRIETARY,
AND IDENTIFYING INFORMATION.
SECTION 3. Effective date. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1077

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1077